Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-132
Frontier.

The county of Frontier is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township five, north, of range thirty, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township five, north, of range twenty-five, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township five, north, of range twenty-five, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township six, north, of range twenty-four, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township eight, north, of range twenty-four, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township eight, north, of range thirty, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 21, p. 216;

R.S.1913, § 845;

C.S.1922, § 747;

C.S.1929, § 25-134;

R.S.1943, § 22-132.